California statutes. Penal Code
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, probation departments may engage in activities designed to prevent adult delinquency. These activities include rendering direct and indirect services to persons in the community. Probation departments shall not be limited to providing services only to those persons on probation being supervised under Section 1203.10, but may provide services to any adults in the community.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 512.)
-------------------------------------------

1203a.

(a) In all counties and cities and counties, the courts therein, having jurisdiction to impose punishment in misdemeanor cases, may refer cases, demand reports, and to do and require anything
 necessary to carry out the purposes of Section 1203, insofar as that section applies to misdemeanors. The court may suspend the imposition or execution of the sentence and make and enforce the terms of probation for a period not to exceed one year.

(b) The one-year probation limit in subdivision (a) shall not apply to any offense that includes specific probation lengths within its provisions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 328, Sec. 1.   (AB 1950)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

1203b.

All courts shall have power to suspend the imposition or execution of a sentence and grant a conditional sentence in misdemeanor and infraction cases without referring such cases to the probation officer. Unless otherwise ordered by the court, persons granted a conditional sentence in the community shall report only to the court and the probation officer shall not be responsible in any way for supervising or accounting for such persons.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 247, Sec. 2.   Effective June 9, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

1203c.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, whenever a person is committed to an institution under the jurisdiction of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, whether probation has been applied for or not, or granted and revoked, it shall be the duty of the probation officer of the county from which the person is committed to send to the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation a report of the circumstances surrounding the offense and the prior record and history of the defendant, as may be required by the Secretary of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation.

(2) If the person is being committed to the jurisdiction of the department for a conviction
 of an offense that requires him or her to register as a sex offender pursuant to Section 290, the probation officer shall include in the report the results of the State-Authorized Risk Assessment Tool for Sex Offenders (SARATSO) administered pursuant to Sections 290.04 to 290.06, inclusive, if applicable.

(b) These reports shall accompany the commitment papers. The reports shall be prepared in the form prescribed by the administrator following consultation with the Board of State and Community Corrections, except that if the defendant is ineligible for probation, a report of the circumstances surrounding the offense and the prior record and history of the defendant, prepared by the probation officer on request of the court and filed with the court before sentence, shall be deemed to meet the requirements of paragraph (1) of subdivision
 (a).

(c) In order to allow the probation officer an opportunity to interview, for the purpose of preparation of these reports, the defendant shall be held in the county jail for 48 hours, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays, subsequent to imposition of sentence and prior to delivery to the custody of the Secretary of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, unless the probation officer has indicated the need for a different period of time.

(d) Whenever a person is committed to an institution under the jurisdiction of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation or a county jail pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170, or is placed on postrelease community supervision or mandatory supervision, and the court has ordered the person to pay restitution to
 a victim, the following shall apply:

(1) If the victim consents, the probation officer of the county from which the person is committed may send the victim’s contact information and a copy of the restitution order to the department or to the county agency designated by the board of supervisors to collect and distribute restitution for the sole purpose of distributing the restitution collected on behalf of the victim.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), the district attorney of the county from which the person is committed may send the victim’s contact information and a copy of the restitution order to the department or to the county agency designated by the board of
 supervisors to collect and distribute restitution for the sole purpose of distributing the restitution collected on behalf of the victim if the district attorney finds it is in the best interest of the victim to send that information. If the victim affirmatively objects, the district attorney shall not send the victim’s contact information. The district attorney shall not be required to inform the victim of the right to object.

(3) The victim’s contact information shall remain confidential and shall not be made part of the court file or combined with any public document.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 517, Sec. 1.   (SB 1197)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

1203d.

No court shall pronounce judgment upon any defendant, as to whom the court has requested a probation report pursuant to Section 1203.10, unless a copy of the probation report has been made available to the court, the prosecuting attorney, and the defendant or his or her attorney, at least two days or, upon the request of the defendant, five days prior to the time fixed by the court for consideration of the report with respect to pronouncement of judgment. The report shall be filed with the clerk of the court as a record in the case at the time the court considers the report.

If the defendant is not represented by an attorney, the court, upon ordering the probation report, shall also order the probation officer who prepares the report to discuss its contents with the defendant. Any waiver of the preparation of the report or the consideration of the report by the court shall be as provided in subdivision (b) of Section 1203, with respect to cases to which that subdivision applies.

The sentence recommendations of the report shall also be made available to the victim of the crime, or the victim’s next of kin if the victim has died, through the district attorney’s office. The victim or the victim’s next of kin shall be informed of the availability of this information through the notice provided pursuant to Section 1191.1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 123, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

1203e.

(a) Commencing June 1, 2010, the probation department shall compile a Facts of Offense Sheet for every person convicted of an offense that requires him or her to register as a sex offender pursuant to Section 290 who is referred to the department pursuant to Section 1203. The Facts of Offense Sheet shall contain the following information concerning the offender: name; CII number; criminal history, including all arrests and convictions for any registerable sex offenses or any violent offense; circumstances of the offense for which registration is required, including, but not limited to, weapons used and victim pattern; and results of the State-Authorized Risk Assessment Tool for Sex Offenders (SARATSO), as set forth in Section 290.04, if required. The Facts of Offense Sheet shall be
 included in the probation officer’s report.

(b) The defendant may move the court to correct the Facts of Offense Sheet. Any corrections to that sheet shall be made consistent with procedures set forth in Section 1204.

(c) The probation officer shall send a copy of the Facts of Offense Sheet to the Department of Justice within 30 days of the person’s sex offense conviction, and it shall be made part of the registered sex offender’s file maintained by the Department of Justice. The Facts of Offense Sheet shall thereafter be made available to law enforcement by the Department of Justice, which shall post it with the offender’s record on the Department of Justice Internet Web site maintained pursuant to Section 290.46, and shall be accessible only to law enforcement.

(d) If the registered sex offender is sentenced to a
 period of incarceration, at either the state prison or a county jail, the Facts of Offense Sheet shall be sent by the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation or the county sheriff to the registering law enforcement agency in the jurisdiction where the registered sex offender will be paroled or will live on release, within three days of the person’s release. If the registered sex offender is committed to the State Department of State Hospitals, the Facts of Offense Sheet shall be sent by the State Department of State Hospitals to the registering law enforcement agency in the jurisdiction where the person will live on release, within three days of release.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 59, Sec. 5.   (SB 1474)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

1203f.

Every probation department shall ensure that all probationers under active supervision who are deemed to pose a high risk to the public of committing sex crimes, as determined by the State-Authorized Risk Assessment Tool for Sex Offenders, as set forth in Sections 290.04 to 290.06, inclusive, are placed on intensive and specialized probation supervision and are required to report frequently to designated probation officers. The probation department may place any other probationer convicted of an offense that requires him or her to register as a sex offender who is on active supervision to be placed on intensive and specialized supervision and require him or her to report frequently to designated probation officers.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 337, Sec. 41.   Effective September 20, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

1203g.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 1203a, for a violation of shoplifting, as defined in Section 459.5, or petty theft, as described in Section 488 or 490.2, the court may suspend the imposition or execution of the sentence and make and enforce the terms of probation for a period not to exceed two years.

(b) If a court imposes a term of probation that exceeds the maximum period of time specified in subdivision (a) of Section 1203a, the court, as a condition of probation, shall consider referring the defendant to a collaborative court or rehabilitation program that is relevant to the underlying factor or factors that led to the commission of the offense. If the defendant who is
 referred to a rehabilitative program is under 25 years of age, the court shall, to the extent such a program is available, refer the defendant to a program modeled on healing-centered, restorative, trauma-informed, and positive youth development approaches and that is provided in collaboration with community-based organizations. If the court finds that referral to a collaborative court or rehabilitation program is not an appropriate condition of probation, it must state the reasons for its finding on the record.

(c) Upon successful completion of the rehabilitation program, as determined by the program provider, or successful participation in the collaborative court, as determined by the collaborative court, the court shall discharge the defendant from probation.

(d) Participation
 in a collaborative court or a rehabilitation program by the defendant shall not exceed the maximum period of time of probation specified in subdivision (a), except with the consent of the defendant.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 168, Sec. 8.   (AB 2943)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1203h.

If the court initiates an investigation pursuant to subdivision (a) or (d) of Section 1203 and the convicted person was convicted of violating any section of this code in which a minor is a victim of an act of abuse or neglect, then the investigation may include a psychological evaluation to determine the extent of counseling necessary for successful rehabilitation and which may be mandated by the court during the term of probation. Such evaluation may be performed by psychiatrists, psychologists, or licensed clinical social workers. The results of the examination shall be included in the probation officer’s report to the court.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 282, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1204.

The circumstances shall be presented by the testimony of witnesses examined in open court, except that when a witness is so sick or infirm as to be unable to attend, his deposition may be taken by a magistrate of the county, out of court, upon such notice to the adverse party as the court may direct. No affidavit or testimony, or representation of any kind, verbal or written, can be offered to or received by the court, or a judge thereof, in aggravation or mitigation of the punishment, except as provided in this and the preceding section. This section shall not be construed to prohibit the filing of a written report by a defendant or defendant’s counsel on behalf of a defendant if such a report presents a study of his background and personality and suggests a rehabilitation program. If such a report is submitted, the prosecution or probation officer shall be permitted to reply to or to evaluate the program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1080.)
-------------------------------------------

1204.1.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that environmental crimes are public welfare offenses resulting from violations of statutes designed to safeguard against threats or injury to the health and safety of the public and California’s environment and precious natural resources.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 1203.1 or 1203a, if an entity
 is granted probation upon conviction of an environmental crime, the term of probation shall not exceed five years, which may include a period of summary probation as appropriate. For purposes of this section, environmental crimes means violations of any crimes in the following sections:

(1) Division 9 (commencing with Section 12000) and Section 5650 of the Fish and Game Code.

(2) Section 12996 of the Food and Agricultural Code.

(3) Sections 132 and 133 of the Harbors and Navigation Code.

(4) Part 14 (commencing with Section 117600) of Division 104 of the Health and Safety Code.

(5) Article 3 (commencing with Section 42400) of Chapter 4 of Part 4 of Division 26 of the Health and Safety Code.

(6) Chapters 6.5 (commencing with Section 25100), Chapter 6.67 (commencing with Section 25270), Chapter 6.7 (commencing with Section 25280), and Chapter 6.95 (commencing with Section
 25500) of Division 20 of the Health and Safety Code.

(7) Chapter 7.4 (commencing with Section 8670.1) of Division 1 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(8) Sections 374.2, 374.3, 374.5, 374.7, 374.8, 597, 653o, 653p, and 653q of the Penal Code.

(9) Section 32001
 and subdivision (b) of Section 34506 of the Vehicle Code.

(10) Section 13387 of the Water Code.

 (c) For purposes of subdivision (b), an entity means a trust, firm, partnership, joint stock company, joint venture, association, limited liability company, corporation, or other legal entity with more than 10 employees.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 264, Sec. 1.   (AB 508)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

1204.5.

(a) In any criminal action, after the filing of any complaint or other accusatory pleading and before a plea, finding, or verdict of guilty, no judge shall read or consider any written report of any law enforcement officer or witness to any offense, any information reflecting the arrest or conviction record of a defendant, or any affidavit or representation of any kind, verbal or written, without the defendant’s consent given in open court, except as provided in the rules of evidence applicable at the trial, or as provided in affidavits in connection with the issuance of a warrant or the hearing of any law and motion matter, or in any application for an order fixing or changing bail, or a petition for a writ.

(b) This section does not preclude a judge, who is not the preliminary hearing or trial judge in the case, from considering any information about the defendant for the purpose of that judge adopting a pre-trial sentencing position or approving or disapproving a guilty plea entered pursuant to Section 1192.5, if all of the following occur:

(1) The defendant is represented by counsel, unless he or she expressly waives the right to counsel.

(2) Any information provided to the judge for either of those purposes is also provided to the district attorney and to the defense counsel at least five days prior to any hearing or conference held for the purpose of considering a proposed guilty plea or proposed sentence.

(3) At any hearing or conference held for either of those purposes, defense counsel or the district attorney is allowed to provide information, either on or off the record, to supplement or rebut the information provided pursuant to paragraph (2).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 86, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

1205.

(a) A judgment that the defendant pay a fine, with or without other punishment, may also direct that the defendant be imprisoned until the fine is satisfied and may further direct that the imprisonment begin at and continue after the expiration of any imprisonment imposed as a part of the punishment or of any other imprisonment to which the defendant may have been sentenced. The judgment shall specify the term of imprisonment for nonpayment of the fine, which shall not be more than one day for each one hundred twenty-five dollars ($125) of the base fine, nor exceed the term for which the defendant may be sentenced to imprisonment for the offense of which the defendant has been convicted. A defendant held in custody for nonpayment of a fine shall be entitled to credit on the fine for each day the defendant
 is held in custody, at the rate specified in the judgment. When the defendant has been convicted of a misdemeanor, a judgment that the defendant pay a fine may also direct that the defendant pay the fine within a limited time or in installments on specified dates, and that in default of payment as stipulated be imprisoned in the discretion of the court either until the defaulted installment is satisfied or until the fine is satisfied in full; but unless the direction is given in the judgment, the fine shall be payable. If an amount of the base fine is not satisfied by jail credits, or by community service, the penalties and assessments imposed on the base fine shall be reduced by the percentage of the base fine that was satisfied.

(b) Except as otherwise provided in case of fines imposed, as a condition of probation, the defendant shall pay the fine to the clerk of the court, or to the judge if there is no clerk, unless the defendant is taken
 into custody for nonpayment of the fine, in which event payments made while the defendant is in custody shall be made to the officer who holds the defendant in custody, and all amounts paid shall be paid over by the officer to the court that rendered the judgment. The clerk shall report to the court every default in payment of a fine or any part of that fine, or if there is no clerk, the court shall take notice of the default. If time has been given for payment of a fine or it has been made payable in installments, the court shall, upon any default in payment, immediately order the arrest of the defendant and order the defendant to show cause why they should not be imprisoned until the fine or installment is satisfied in full. If the fine or installment is payable forthwith and it is not paid, the court shall, without further proceedings, immediately commit the defendant to the custody of the proper officer to be held in custody until the fine or installment is satisfied in full.

(c) This section applies to any violation of any of the codes or statutes of this state punishable by a fine or by a fine and imprisonment.

(d) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit the clerk of the court, or the judge if there is no clerk, from turning these accounts over to another county department or a collecting agency for processing and collection.

(e) This section shall not apply to restitution fines and restitution orders.

(f) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2022.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 31) and added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 257, Sec. 32.   (AB 177)   Effective September 23, 2021.   Operative January 1, 2022, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

1205.3.

In any case in which a defendant is convicted of an offense and granted probation, and the court orders the defendant either to pay a fine or to perform specified community service work as a condition of probation, the court shall specify that if community service work is performed, it shall be performed in place of the payment of all fines and restitution fines on a proportional basis, and the court shall specify in its order the amount of the fine and restitution fine and the number of hours of community service work that shall be performed as an alternative to payment of the fine.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1077, Sec. 23.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

1207.

When judgment upon a conviction is rendered, the clerk must enter the judgment in the minutes, stating briefly the offense for which the conviction was had, and the fact of a prior conviction, if any. A copy of the judgment of conviction shall be filed with the papers in the case.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 263, Sec. 28.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

1208.

(a) (1) The provisions of this section, insofar as they relate to employment, shall be operative in any county in which the board of supervisors by ordinance finds, on the basis of employment conditions, the state of the county jail facilities, and other pertinent circumstances, that the operation of this section, insofar as it relates to employment, in that county is feasible. The provisions of this section, insofar as they relate to job training, shall be operative in any county in which the board of supervisors by ordinance finds, on the basis of job training conditions, the state of the county jail facilities, and other pertinent circumstances, that the operation of this section, insofar as it relates to job training, in that county is feasible. The provisions of this section,
 insofar as they relate to education, shall be operative in any county in which the board of supervisors by ordinance finds, on the basis of education conditions, the state of the county jail facilities, and other pertinent circumstances, that the operation of this section, insofar as it relates to education, in that county is feasible. In any ordinance the board shall prescribe whether the sheriff, the probation officer, the director of the county department of corrections, or the superintendent of a county industrial farm or industrial road camp in the county shall perform the functions of the work furlough administrator. The board may, in that ordinance, provide for the performance of any or all functions of the work furlough administrator by any one or more of those persons, acting separately or jointly as to any of the functions; and may, by a subsequent ordinance, revise the provisions within the authorization of this section. The board of supervisors may also terminate the operation of this section,
 either with respect to employment, job training, or education in the county, if the board finds by ordinance that because of changed circumstances, the operation of this section, either with respect to employment, job training, or education in that county, is no longer feasible.

(2) Notwithstanding any other law, the board of supervisors may by ordinance designate a facility for confinement of prisoners classified for the work furlough program and designate the work furlough administrator as the custodian of the facility. The work furlough administrator may operate the work furlough facility or, with the approval of the board of supervisors, administer the work furlough facility pursuant to written contracts with appropriate public or private agencies or private entities. No agency or private entity may operate a work furlough program or facility without a written contract with the work furlough administrator, and no agency or private entity
 entering into a written contract may itself employ any person who is in the work furlough program. The sheriff or director of the county department of corrections, as the case may be, is authorized to transfer custody of prisoners to the work furlough administrator to be confined in a facility for the period during which they are in the work furlough program.

(3) All privately operated local work furlough facilities and programs shall be under the jurisdiction of, and subject to the terms of a written contract entered into with, the work furlough administrator. Each contract shall include, but not be limited to, a provision whereby the private agency or entity agrees to operate in compliance with all appropriate state and local building, zoning, health, safety, and fire statutes, ordinances, and regulations and the minimum jail standards for Type IV facilities as established by regulations adopted by the Board of State and Community
 Corrections. The private agency or entity shall select and train its personnel in accordance with selection and training requirements adopted by the Board of State and Community Corrections as set forth in Subchapter 1 (commencing with Section 100) of Chapter 1 of Division 1 of Title 15 of the California Code of Regulations. Failure to comply with the appropriate health, safety, and fire laws or minimum jail standards adopted by the board may be cause for termination of the contract. Upon discovery of a failure to comply with these requirements, the work furlough administrator shall notify the privately operated program director that the contract may be canceled if the specified deficiencies are not corrected within 60 days.

(4) All private work furlough facilities and programs shall be inspected biennially by the Board of State and Community Corrections unless the work furlough administrator requests an earlier inspection pursuant to Section
 6031.1. Each private agency or entity shall pay a fee to the Board of State and Community Corrections commensurate with the cost of those inspections and a fee commensurate with the cost of the initial review of the facility.

(b) When a person is convicted and sentenced to the county jail, or is imprisoned in the county jail for nonpayment of a fine, for contempt, or as a condition of probation for any criminal offense, the work furlough administrator may, if the administrator concludes that the person is a fit subject to continue in the person’s regular employment, direct that the person be permitted to continue in that employment, if that is compatible with the requirements of subdivision (c), or may authorize the person to secure employment for themselves, unless the court at the time of sentencing or committing has ordered that the person not be granted work furloughs. The work furlough administrator may, if the administrator concludes that
 the person is a fit subject to continue in the person’s job training program, direct that the person be permitted to continue in that job training program, if that is compatible with the requirements of subdivision (c), or may authorize the person to secure local job training for themselves, unless the court at the time of sentencing has ordered that person not be granted work furloughs. The work furlough administrator may, if the administrator concludes that the person is a fit subject to continue in the person’s regular educational program, direct that the person be permitted to continue in that educational program, if that is compatible with the requirements of subdivision (c), or may authorize the person to secure education for themselves, unless the court at the time of sentencing has ordered that person not be granted work furloughs.

(c) If the work furlough administrator so directs that the prisoner be permitted to continue in the
 prisoner’s regular employment, job training, or educational program, the administrator shall arrange for a continuation of that employment or for that job training or education, so far as possible without interruption. If the prisoner does not have regular employment or a regular job training or educational program, and the administrator has authorized the prisoner to secure employment, job training, or education for themselves, the prisoner may do so, and the administrator may assist the prisoner in doing so. Any employment, job training, or education so secured shall be suitable for the prisoner. The employment, and the job training or educational program if it includes earnings by the prisoner, shall be at a wage at least as high as the prevailing wage for similar work in the area where the work is performed and in accordance with the prevailing working conditions in that area. In no event may any employment, job training, or educational program involving earnings by the prisoner be permitted where there
 is a labor dispute in the establishment in which the prisoner is, or is to be, employed, trained, or educated.

(d) (1) Whenever the prisoner is not employed or being trained or educated and between the hours or periods of employment, training, or education, the prisoner shall be confined in the facility designated by the board of supervisors for work furlough confinement unless the work furlough administrator directs otherwise. If the prisoner is injured during a period of employment, job training, or education, the work furlough administrator shall have the authority to release the prisoner from the facility for continued medical treatment by private physicians or at medical facilities at the expense of the employer, workers’ compensation insurer, or the prisoner. The release shall not be construed as assumption of liability by the county or work furlough administrator for medical treatment obtained.

(2) The work furlough administrator may release any prisoner classified for the work furlough program for a period not to exceed 72 hours for medical, dental, or psychiatric care, or for family emergencies or pressing business which would result in severe hardship if the release were not granted, or to attend those activities as the administrator deems may effectively promote the prisoner’s successful return to the community, including, but not limited to, an attempt to secure housing, employment, entry into educational programs, or participation in community programs.

(e) The earnings of the prisoner may be collected by the work furlough administrator, and it shall be the duty of the prisoner’s employer to transmit the wages to the administrator at the latter’s request. Earnings levied upon pursuant to writ of execution or in other lawful manner shall not be transmitted to the
 administrator. If the administrator has requested transmittal of earnings prior to levy, that request shall have priority. In a case in which the functions of the administrator are performed by a sheriff, and the sheriff receives a writ of execution for the earnings of a prisoner subject to this section but has not yet requested transmittal of the prisoner’s earnings pursuant to this section, the sheriff shall first levy on the earnings pursuant to the writ. When an employer or educator transmits earnings to the administrator pursuant to this subdivision, the sheriff shall have no liability to the prisoner for those earnings. From the earnings the administrator shall pay the prisoner’s board and personal expenses, both inside and outside the jail, and shall deduct so much of the costs of administration of this section as is allocable to the prisoner or if the prisoner is unable to pay that sum, a lesser sum as is reasonable, and, in an amount determined by the administrator, shall pay the support of the
 prisoner’s dependents, if any. If sufficient funds are available after making the foregoing payments, the administrator may, with the consent of the prisoner, pay, in whole or in part, the preexisting debts of the prisoner. Any balance shall be retained until the prisoner’s discharge. Upon discharge the balance shall be paid to the prisoner.

(f) The prisoner shall be eligible for time credits pursuant to Sections 4018 and 4019.

(g) If the prisoner violates the conditions laid down for the prisoner’s conduct, custody, job training, education, or employment, the work furlough administrator may order the balance of the prisoner’s sentence to be spent in actual confinement.

(h) Willful failure of the prisoner to return to the place of confinement not later than the expiration of any period during which the prisoner is
 authorized to be away from the place of confinement pursuant to this section is punishable as provided in Section 4532.

(i) The court may recommend or refer a person to the work furlough administrator for consideration for placement in the work furlough program or a particular work furlough facility. The recommendation or referral of the court shall be given great weight in the determination of acceptance or denial for placement in the work furlough program or a particular work furlough facility.

(j) As used in this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Education” includes vocational and educational training and counseling, and psychological, drug abuse, alcoholic, and other rehabilitative counseling.

(2) “Educator” includes a person or
 institution providing that training or counseling.

(3) “Employment” includes care of children, including the daytime care of children of the prisoner.

(4) “Job training” may include, but shall not be limited to, job training assistance.

(k) This section shall be known and may be cited as the “Cobey Work Furlough Law.”

(l) This section shall become operative July 1, 2021.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 55) and added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 92, Sec. 56.   (AB 1869)   Effective September 18, 2020.   Operative July 1, 2021, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

1208.2.

(a) (1) This section shall apply to individuals authorized to participate in a work furlough program pursuant to Section 1208, or to individuals authorized to participate in an electronic home detention program pursuant to Section 1203.016 or 1203.018, or to individuals authorized to participate in a county parole program pursuant to Article 3.5 (commencing with Section 3074) of Chapter 8 of Title 1 of Part 3.

(2) As used in this section, as appropriate, “administrator” means the sheriff, probation officer, director of the county department of corrections, or county parole administrator.

(b) (1) A board of supervisors that implements programs identified
 in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) shall not impose a program administrative fee.

(2) Privately operated electronic home detention programs pursuant to Section 1203.016 or 1203.018 or work furlough programs pursuant to Section 1208 shall not impose program administrative fees or application fees.

(c) In all circumstances where a county board of supervisors has approved a program administrator, as described in Section 1203.016, 1203.018, or 1208, to enter into
 a contract with a private agency or entity to provide specified program services, the program administrator shall ensure that the provisions of this section are contained within any contractual agreement for this purpose. All privately operated home detention programs shall comply with all appropriate, applicable ordinances and regulations specified in subdivision (a) of Section 1208.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 57, Sec. 17.   (AB 199)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1208.3.

The administrator is not prohibited from verifying any of the following:

(a) That the prisoner is receiving wages at a rate of pay not less than the prevailing minimum wage requirement as provided for in subdivision (c) of Section 1208.

(b) That the prisoner is working a specified minimum number of required hours.

(c) (1) That the prisoner is covered under an appropriate or suitable workers’ compensation insurance plan as may otherwise be required by law.

(2) The purpose of the verification shall be solely to ensure that the prisoner’s employment
 rights are being protected, that the prisoner is not being taken advantage of, that the job is suitable for the prisoner, and that the prisoner is making every reasonable effort to make a productive contribution to the community.

(d) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2021.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 59) and added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 92, Sec. 60.   (AB 1869)   Effective September 18, 2020.   Operative July 1, 2021, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

1208.5.

The boards of supervisors of two or more counties having work furlough programs may enter into agreements whereby a person sentenced to, or imprisoned in, the jail of one county, but regularly residing in another county or regularly employed in another county, may be transferred by the sheriff of the county in which he or she is confined to the jail of the county in which he or she resides or is employed, in order that he or she may be enabled to continue in his or her regular employment or education in the other county through the county’s work furlough program. This agreement may make provision for the support of transferred persons by the county from which they are transferred. The board of supervisors of any county may, by ordinance, delegate the authority to enter into these agreements to the work furlough administrator.

This section shall become operative on January 1, 1999.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 437, Sec. 8) by Stats. 1994, Ch. 770, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1995.   Section operative January 1, 1999, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

1209.

Upon conviction of any criminal offense for which the court orders the confinement of a person in the county jail, or other suitable place of confinement, either as the final sentence or as a condition of any grant of probation, and allows the person so sentenced to continue in his or her regular employment by serving the sentence on weekends or similar periods during the week other than their regular workdays and by virtue of this schedule of serving the sentence the prisoner is ineligible for work furlough under Section 1208, the county may collect from the defendant according to the defendant’s ability to pay so much of the costs of administration of this section as are allocable to such defendant. The amount of this fee shall not exceed the actual costs of such confinement and may be collected prior to completion of each weekly or monthly period of confinement until the entire sentence has been served, and the funds shall be deposited in the county treasury pursuant to county ordinance.
